District of Columbia statutes.
2-116

Repeal of inconsistent provisions; exception.

All laws or parts of laws relating to boiler inspection in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter are hereby repealed: Provided, that no provision of this subchapter shall be deemed to amend, alter, or repeal §§ 3-2701 to 3-2707 [repealed].

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1919, ch. 802, § 15

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1016.
1973 Ed., § 1-716.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 6-42 added § 2-2408 § 3-2708, 2001 Ed. to the chapter referred to in the text.

Editor's Notes